North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 12J. Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety.

§ 120-70.93.
Creation and membership of Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety.

The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety is established. The Committee consists of 22 members as follows:

Eleven members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, at least three of whom are members of the minority party; and

Eleven members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, at least three of whom are members of the minority party.

Terms on the Committee are for two years and begin on the convening of the General Assembly in each odd-numbered year, except the terms of the initial members, which begin on appointment and end on the day of the convening of the 1995 General Assembly. Members may complete a term of service on the Committee even if they do not seek reelection or are not reelected to the General Assembly, but resignation or removal from service in the General Assembly constitutes resignation or removal from service on the Committee.

A member continues to serve until his successor is appointed. A vacancy shall be filled within 30 days by the officer who made the original appointment.

History.

1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 49(a); 1997-443, s. 21.4(a); 2001-138, s. 2; 2011-291, s. 1.4(c).

§ 120-70.94.
Purpose and powers of Committee. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety shall examine, on a continuing basis, the correctional, law enforcement, and juvenile justice systems in North Carolina, in order to make ongoing recommendations to the General Assembly on ways to improve those systems and to assist those systems in realizing their objectives of protecting the public and of punishing and rehabilitating offenders. In this examination, the Committee shall:

Study the budget, programs, and policies of the Department of Public Safety to determine ways in which the General Assembly may improve the effectiveness of the Department.

Examine the effectiveness of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety in implementing the public policy stated in

G.S. 148-26

of providing work assignments and employment for inmates as a means of reducing the cost of maintaining the inmate population while enabling inmates to acquire or retain skills and work habits needed to secure honest employment after their release.

(2a)

Examine the effectiveness of the Department of Public Safety in implementing the duties and responsibilities charged to the Department in G.S. 143B-601(1) through (9) and the overall effectiveness and efficiency of law enforcement in the State.

(2b)

Examine the effectiveness of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety in implementing the duties and responsibilities charged to the Division in Part 3 of Article 13 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes and the overall effectiveness and efficiency of the juvenile justice system in the State.

Recodified as subdivision (a)(13) by Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.4(c), effective June 24, 2011.

(3a)

Study and evaluate the funding sources and needs of domestic violence programs providing services to domestic violence victims and programs providing treatment to domestic violence abusers.

Study legal services funding for domestic violence victims and explore additional sources of funding.

Explore sources of additional funding for all domestic violence programs, including visitation centers.

Examine current programs and explore new programs to provide effective services to domestic violence victims and treatment to domestic violence abusers.

Examine law enforcement and judicial responses to domestic violence.

Review data collected on domestic violence cases pursuant to

G.S. 15A-1382.1

.

Study the effectiveness of the Crime Victims Rights Act as it relates to domestic violence.

Study the needs of juveniles. This study may include, but is not limited to:

Determining the adequacy and appropriateness of services:

To children and youth receiving child welfare services;

To children and youth in the juvenile court system;

Provided by the Division of Social Services of the Department of Health and Human Services and the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety;

To children and youth served by the Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services system.

Developing methods for identifying and providing services to children and youth not receiving but in need of child welfare services, children and youth at risk of entering the juvenile court system, and children and youth exposed to domestic violence situations.

Identifying obstacles to ensuring that children who are in secure or nonsecure custody are placed in safe and permanent homes within a reasonable period of time and recommending strategies for overcoming those obstacles. The Commission shall consider what, if anything, can be done to expedite the adjudication and appeal of abuse and neglect charges against parents so that decisions may be made about the safe and permanent placement of their children as quickly as possible.

Evaluate problems associated with juveniles who are beyond the disciplinary control of their parents, including juveniles who are runaways, and develop solutions for addressing the problems of those juveniles.

Identify strategies for the development and funding of a comprehensive statewide database relating to children and youth to facilitate State agency planning for delivery of services to children and youth.

Study any other matter that the Committee considers necessary.

The Committee may make interim reports to the General Assembly on matters for which it may report to a regular session of the General Assembly. A report to the General Assembly may contain any legislation needed to implement a recommendation of the Committee.

History.

1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 49(a); 1997-443, s. 21.4(a); 2001-138, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), (h), (l), (ii); 2011-291, s. 1.4(c); 2012-194, s. 23; 2017-186, s. 2(iiiii).

§ 120-70.94.
Purpose and powers of Committee. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety shall examine, on a continuing basis, the correctional, law enforcement, and juvenile justice systems in North Carolina, in order to make ongoing recommendations to the General Assembly on ways to improve those systems and to assist those systems in realizing their objectives of protecting the public and of punishing and rehabilitating offenders. In this examination, the Committee shall:

Study the budget, programs, and policies of the Department of Public Safety and the Department of Adult Correction to determine ways in which the General Assembly may improve the effectiveness of the Departments.

Examine the effectiveness of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction in implementing the public policy stated in

G.S. 148-26

of providing work assignments and employment for inmates as a means of reducing the cost of maintaining the inmate population while enabling inmates to acquire or retain skills and work habits needed to secure honest employment after their release.

(2a)

Examine the effectiveness of the Department of Public Safety in implementing the duties and responsibilities charged to the Department in G.S. 143B-601(1) through (9) and the overall effectiveness and efficiency of law enforcement in the State.

(2b)

Examine the effectiveness of the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety in implementing the duties and responsibilities charged to the Division in Part 3 of Article 13 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes and the overall effectiveness and efficiency of the juvenile justice system in the State.

Recodified as subdivision (a)(13) by Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.4(c), effective June 24, 2011.

(3a)

Study and evaluate the funding sources and needs of domestic violence programs providing services to domestic violence victims and programs providing treatment to domestic violence abusers.

Study legal services funding for domestic violence victims and explore additional sources of funding.

Explore sources of additional funding for all domestic violence programs, including visitation centers.

Examine current programs and explore new programs to provide effective services to domestic violence victims and treatment to domestic violence abusers.

Examine law enforcement and judicial responses to domestic violence.

Review data collected on domestic violence cases pursuant to

G.S. 15A-1382.1

.

Study the effectiveness of the Crime Victims Rights Act as it relates to domestic violence.

Study the needs of juveniles. This study may include, but is not limited to:

Determining the adequacy and appropriateness of services:

To children and youth receiving child welfare services.

To children and youth in the juvenile court system.

Provided by the Division of Social Services of the Department of Health and Human Services and the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety.

To children and youth served by the Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services system.

Developing methods for identifying and providing services to children and youth not receiving but in need of child welfare services, children and youth at risk of entering the juvenile court system, and children and youth exposed to domestic violence situations.

Identifying obstacles to ensuring that children who are in secure or nonsecure custody are placed in safe and permanent homes within a reasonable period of time and recommending strategies for overcoming those obstacles. The Commission shall consider what, if anything, can be done to expedite the adjudication and appeal of abuse and neglect charges against parents so that decisions may be made about the safe and permanent placement of their children as quickly as possible.

Evaluate problems associated with juveniles who are beyond the disciplinary control of their parents, including juveniles who are runaways, and develop solutions for addressing the problems of those juveniles.

Identify strategies for the development and funding of a comprehensive statewide database relating to children and youth to facilitate State agency planning for delivery of services to children and youth.

Study any other matter that the Committee considers necessary.

The Committee may make interim reports to the General Assembly on matters for which it may report to a regular session of the General Assembly. A report to the General Assembly may contain any legislation needed to implement a recommendation of the Committee.

History.

1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 49(a); 1997-443, s. 21.4(a); 2001-138, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), (h), (l), (ii); 2011-291, s. 1.4(c); 2012-194, s. 23; 2017-186, s. 2(iiiii); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(nnn).

§ 120-70.95.
Organization of Committee.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each designate a cochair of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety. The Committee shall meet at least once a quarter and may meet at other times upon the joint call of the cochairs.

A quorum of the Committee is nine members. No action may be taken except by a majority vote at a meeting at which a quorum is present. While in the discharge of its official duties, the Committee has the powers of a joint committee under

G.S. 120-19

and

G.S. 120-19

.1 through

G.S. 120-19.4

.

Members of the Committee receive subsistence and travel expenses as provided in

G.S. 120-3.1

. The Committee may contract for consultants or hire employees in accordance with

G.S. 120-32.02

. The Legislative Services Commission, through the Legislative Services Officer, shall assign professional staff to assist the Committee in its work. Upon the direction of the Legislative Services Commission, the Supervisors of Clerks of the Senate and of the House of Representatives shall assign clerical staff to the Committee. The expenses for clerical employees shall be borne by the Committee.

History.

1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 49(a); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 8(k); 1997-443, s. 21.4(a); 2001-138, s. 2; 2011-291, s. 1.4(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.4(c), effective June 24, 2011, substituted “Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety” for “Joint Legislative Corrections, Crime Control, and Juvenile Justice Oversight Committee” in subsection (a).

§§ 120-70.96 through 120-70.99.

Reserved for future codification purposes.